Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Subchapter 2. Joint Fiscal Office

§ 521.
Creation and purpose.

The Joint Fiscal Office is created as a permanent agency to provide the General Assembly with services relating to the fiscal operations of the State, including revenues, budgeting, and expenditures.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 522.
Chief Fiscal Officer; employees.

The Joint Fiscal Committee shall employ an individual to be the Chief Fiscal Officer of the Joint Fiscal Office.
(a) (1) The Joint Fiscal Committee shall employ an individual to be the Chief Fiscal Officer of the Joint Fiscal Office.

The Chief Fiscal Officer shall employ fiscal, research, and other professional staff as needed to carry out the duties of the Joint Fiscal Office, except that requests for new, permanent positions shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

All individuals employed by the Joint Fiscal Office shall be subject to the personnel policies adopted by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

The provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 13 (classification of State personnel) shall not apply to employees of the Joint Fiscal Office unless this exception is partially or wholly waived by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 523.
Functions; confidentiality.

The Joint Fiscal Office shall furnish:

nonpartisan research and administrative services of a fiscal nature to the Joint Fiscal Committee and, at the direction of the Joint Fiscal Committee, to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance, the House Committee on Ways and Means, the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Institutions;

nonpartisan research and administrative services of a fiscal nature to other legislative committees and members of the General Assembly, to the extent practicable; and

fiscal and budget assistance to the Joint Legislative Management Committee and to the other legislative offices.

All requests for assistance, information, and advice from the Joint Fiscal Office, all information received in connection with fiscal research or related drafting, and all confidential materials provided to or generated by the Joint Fiscal Office shall remain confidential unless the party requesting or providing the information designates that it is not confidential.
(b) (1) All requests for assistance, information, and advice from the Joint Fiscal Office, all information received in connection with fiscal research or related drafting, and all confidential materials provided to or generated by the Joint Fiscal Office shall remain confidential unless the party requesting or providing the information designates that it is not confidential.

Recordings and minutes of committee meetings and material appearing in the journals or calendars of either house are official documents and materials and shall not be confidential under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 524.
Budget.

The Chief Fiscal Officer shall propose a budget for the Joint Fiscal Office to the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 525.
Intergovernmental cooperation.

For the purposes of carrying out its duties, the Joint Fiscal Office shall have access to and the right to copy any public record of all executive, administrative, and judicial departments of the State, except income and franchise tax returns and other documents classified as confidential by law unless permitted under

32 V.S.A. § 3102

.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 526.
Basic needs budget and livable wage; report.

For the purposes of this section:

“Basic needs” means the essentials needed to run a household, including food, housing, transportation, child care, utilities, health and dental care, taxes, rental and life insurance, personal expenses, and savings.

“Basic needs budget” is the amount of money needed by a Vermont household to maintain a basic standard of living, calculated using current State and federal data sources for the costs of basic needs.

“Livable wage” means the hourly wage required for a full-time worker to pay for one-half of the basic needs budget for a two-person household with no children and employer-assisted health insurance averaged for both urban and rural areas.

On or before January 15 of each new legislative biennium, beginning in 2009, the Joint Fiscal Office shall report the calculated basic needs budgets of various representative household configurations and the calculated livable wage for the previous year. This calculation may serve as an additional indicator of wage and other economic conditions in the State and shall not be considered official State guidance on wages or other forms of compensation.

The methodology for calculating basic needs budgets shall be built on methodology described in the November 9, 1999 Livable Income Study Committee report, modified as appropriate by any statutory changes made by the General Assembly and subsequent modifications adopted by the Joint Fiscal Committee under subsection (d) of this section.

The Joint Fiscal Committee may adopt modifications to the methodology used to determine the basic needs budget calculations under subsection (c) of this section to account for public policy changes, data availability, or any other factors that have had an impact on any aspects of the methodology. Changes or revisions in methodology adopted by the Committee shall be effective no later than November in the year preceding the release of the report.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 59

, § 1; amended

2007, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(c) (redesignated from

2 V.S.A. § 505

).